Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB84.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2601-J of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 2601-J. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Equipment." The term includes property, whether fixed or movable, that is incidental and necessary to conduct an educational program. The term includes, but is not limited to, 1234567891011121314151617181920 movable equipment such as desks, chairs, tables, information technology infrastructure, portable physical education equipment, audio-visual equipment and science, family and consumer science, industrial art and business equipment and instructional materials and fixtures such as casework, laboratory equipment, kitchen equipment, auditorium seating and any other special fixtures or equipment required to conduct a particular educational program.* * *"Maintenance costs." The term includes the cost for routine, preventative, predictive and emergent unscheduled tasks and minor repairs required to ensure that a facility functions according to its design and for its expected lifespan."Nonconstruction costs." The term includes design fees, financing, permitting, construction management fees, legal fees, advertising fees, insurance and equipment."Operations costs." The term includes the cost for custodial, security and utility services required to keep a facility clean and safe so that occupants are comfortable, healthy and productive, and for the operational services required for a vacant facility or site.* * *"Total project costs." The term includes all of the costs to implement a facility improvement measure, including, but not limited to, construction, site costs and nonconstruction costs.* * *Section 2. Section 2605-J of the act is amended to read:Section 2605-J. [Building] Facilities condition assessments.[(a) Duties of department.--(1) The department shall develop guidelines for school 20250SB0084PN0039 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 entities to voluntarily report information related to school building safety, inventory and condition. The guidelines shall include a building condition assessment to be voluntarily completed every 10 years for school entities that includes, but is not limited to, a projection of costs to maintain and renovate existing school buildings.(2) The department shall post completed building condition assessments on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(3) The department shall provide additional points under the funding rubric contained in section 2604-J(d) for grants applied for by school entities that complete building condition assessments.(b) Completion incentive.--A school entity that completes a building condition assessment shall receive a 2% increase above the amount calculated under section 2606-J. The department shall develop a process, in coordination with the application process in section 2602-J, for awarding an enhanced reimbursement for completing a building condition assessment.](c) Duty of department.--By October 1, 2025, the department shall develop a facilities condition assessment form for a school entity to use in filing assessments under subsection (d). The form shall require the following information to be reported:(1) School entity enrollment.(2) A list of the names, addresses, building age, including dates and descriptions of major renovations, owned or leased status, including who is responsible for maintenance, of all school entity buildings.(3) A condition assessment of all school entity buildings, including:20250SB0084PN0039 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Structural components, including walls, floors, roofs, windows and doors.(ii) System components, including mechanical, electrical, plumbing, ventilation, heating and air conditioning.(iii) Interior components, including finishes and fixtures.(iv) Exterior components, including finishes and fixtures.(4) Estimated annual operations costs and maintenance costs for the next seven years.(5) Expected facility improvements, including estimated total project costs for the next five years.(6) Asbestos, lead, air quality and water quality mitigation plans, including costs for remediation.(7) Estimated costs for nonstructural safety concerns such as the need for secure vestibules, escape routes, recessed doors and other design features that would reduce the possibility of or the severity of a violent incident.(8) Evidence of compliance with 35 Pa.C.S. § 7701 (relating to duties concerning disaster prevention). A copy of an "All-Hazards" plan may be used to satisfy the requirements of this paragraph.(d) Duty of school entities.--By October 1, 2026, and every seven years thereafter, a school entity shall submit a facilities condition assessment to the department. The assessment may be conducted by an individual with professional qualifications and experience in architecture, engineering, construction or facilities management.(e) Effect of failure to comply.--A school entity that fails 20250SB0084PN0039 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under subsection (d) to submit a complete facilities condition assessment to the department shall disqualify the school entity from being eligible for a grant under section 1753.2-E of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, or reimbursement under section 2602-J or a grant under section 2604-J or 2603-L.(f) Public posting of assessments.--The department shall post a list of school entities that have submitted a completed facility condition assessment on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"School entity." A school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school or regional charter school.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0084PN0039 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617